Illinois, session 104th, HB5345.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/1)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1001) 7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Environmental Protection Act".9(Source: P.A. 76-2429.)